North Dakota, session 69, SB2396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 10-30.5-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
10-30.5-08. Annual audit.
The board of directorsstate auditor's office may conduct an annual audit of the financial statements
of the corporation pursuant to this section. If the state auditor's office does not conduct the audit, the
state auditor's office shall contract with a certified public accounting firm to audit annually the financial
statements of the corporation in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards. The cost of the
audit must be borne by the corporation.
SECTION 2. PERFORMANCE AUDIT - NORTH DAKOTA DEVELOPMENT FUND - REPORT TO
LEGISLATIVE AUDIT AND FISCAL REVIEW COMMITTEE - REPORT TO LEGISLATIVE
MANAGEMENT.
1. The state auditor's office shall contract with an independent third party for the completion of a
performance audit of the North Dakota development fund for the period beginning July 1,
2019, and ending June 30, 2024. The state auditor's office shall receive the final audit report
by August 1, 2026.
2. The performance audit must address the economy, efficiency, and effectiveness of the North
Dakota development fund by examining internal processes, controls, and results to identify
areas for improvement and provide recommendations for corrective actions.
3. After the report is received under subsection 1, the state auditor's office shall present the
report at the next meeting of the legislative audit and fiscal review committee. Before
September 30, 2026, the state auditor's office also shall present the report to the legislative
management.
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - PERFORMANCE AUDIT - NORTH DAKOTA DEVELOPMENT
FUND - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state
treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $250,000, or so much of the sum as may be
necessary, to the state auditor's office for the purpose of contracting for a performance audit of the
North Dakota development fund, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
The appropriation provided in this section is considered a one-time funding item.

S. B. NO. 2396 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2396.
Senate Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 3 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 3 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State